Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Part 2. Consumer Credit Insurance

§ 40-14-430.
Term of insurance.

Consumer credit insurance provided by a creditor may be subject to the furnishing of evidence of insurability satisfactory to the insurer. Whether or not such evidence is required, the term of the insurance shall commence no later than when the debtor becomes obligated to the creditor or when the debtor applies for the insurance, whichever is later, except as follows:

If any required evidence of insurability is not furnished until more than thirty (30) days after the term would otherwise commence, the term may commence on the date when the insurer determines the evidence to be satisfactory; or

If the creditor provides insurance not previously provided covering debts previously created, the term may commence on the effective date of the policy.

The originally scheduled term of the insurance shall extend at least until the due date of the last scheduled payment of the debt except as follows:

If the insurance relates to a revolving charge account or revolving loan account, the term need extend only until the payment of the debt under the account and may be sooner terminated after at least thirty (30) days notice to the debtor; or

If the debtor is advised in writing that the insurance will be written for a specified shorter time, the term need extend only until the end of the specified time.

The term of the insurance shall not extend more than fifteen (15) days after the originally scheduled due date of the last scheduled payment of the debt unless it is extended without additional cost to the debtor or as an incident to a deferral, refinancing, or consolidation.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 4-201; W.S. 1957, § 40-4-201.

§ 40-14-431.
Amount of insurance.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section:

In the case of consumer credit insurance providing life coverage, the amount of insurance may not initially exceed the debt and, if the debt is payable in installments, may not at any time exceed the greater of the scheduled or actual amount of the debt; or

In the case of any other consumer credit insurance, the total amount of periodic benefits payable may not exceed the total of scheduled unpaid installments of the debt, and the amount of any periodic benefit may not exceed the original amount of debt divided by the number of periodic installments in which it is payable.

If consumer credit insurance is provided in connection with a revolving charge account or revolving loan account, the amounts payable as insurance benefits may be reasonably commensurate with the amount of debt as it exists from time to time. If consumer credit insurance is provided in connection with a commitment to grant credit in the future, the amounts payable as insurance benefits may be reasonably commensurate with the total from time to time of the amount of debt and the amount of the commitment.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 4-202; W.S. 1957, § 40-4-202; Laws 1981, ch. 147, § 1.

§ 40-14-432.
Filing and approval of rates and forms.

A creditor may not use a form or a schedule of premium rates or charges, the filing of which is required by this section, if the commissioner of insurance has disapproved the form or schedule and has notified the insurer of his disapproval. A creditor may not use a form or schedule unless:

The form or schedule has been on file with the commissioner of insurance for thirty (30) days, or has earlier been approved by him; and

The insurer has complied with this section with respect to the insurance.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, all policies, certificates of insurance, notices of proposed insurance, applications for insurance, endorsements and riders relating to consumer credit insurance delivered or issued for delivery in this state, and the schedules of premium rates or charges pertaining thereto, shall be filed by the insurer with the commissioner of insurance. Within thirty (30) days after the filing of any form or schedule, he shall disapprove it if the premium rates or charges are unreasonable in relation to the benefits provided under the form, or if the form contains provisions which are unjust, unfair, inequitable, or deceptive, or encourage misrepresentation of the coverage, or are contrary to any provision of the Insurance Code [title 26] or of any rule or regulation promulgated thereunder.

If a group policy has been delivered in another state, the forms to be filed by the insurer with the commissioner of insurance are the group certificates and notices of proposed insurance. He shall approve them if:

They provide the information that would be required if the group policy were delivered in this state; and

The applicable premium rates or charges do not exceed those established by his rules or regulations.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 4-203; W.S. 1957, § 40-4-203.

Cross references. —

As to filing of policies with insurance commissioner, see §

26-21-108

.